Massachusetts, session 194th, H4258.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of health and
human services, in conjunction with the secretary of aging and independence, shall take action,
including requesting federal approval, if required, to permit spouses to serve as paid caregivers in
the MassHealth program. Any federal approvals that may be required to implement this section
shall be filed no later than 6 months after the effective date of this act.
of 1